Illinois, session 104th, HB5771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $450,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for competitive 7per capita grants for prison education programs that assist 8incarcerated students in attaining associate degrees. 9    Section 10. The sum of $350,000, or so much of that amount 10as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Board of Higher Education for competitive per 12capita grants for prison education programs that assist 13incarcerated students in attaining bachelor's degrees. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.